Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1749
Marketing plan; seller; records required.

Every seller subject to the Seller-Assisted Marketing Plan Act shall at all times keep and maintain a complete set of books, records, and accounts of seller-assisted marketing plan sales made by the seller. All documents relating to each specific seller-assisted marketing plan sold or leased shall be maintained for four years after the date of the seller-assisted marketing plan contract.

Laws 1979, LB 180, § 49;

Laws 2003, LB 217, § 43.